Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1805
Committee; members; expenses.

Members of the committee shall receive no reimbursement for the performance of their duties as members of the committee, except that such members shall receive reimbursement for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 199;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 126.